Rhode Island, session 2026, HB8469.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Title 45 of the General Laws entitled "TOWNS AND CITIES" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 53.1
COVENTRY'S NEW CONSTRUCTION PROJECTS ACT
45-53.1-1. Title.
This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the "Coventry's New Construction Projects
Act."
45-53.1-2. Definitions.
For the purposes of this chapter, the following words and terms shall have the following
meanings:
(1) "Bonus units" means additional residential units approved by the town of Coventry as
part of a development project in accordance with the town's zoning and development policies.
(2) "Building permit" means a permit issued by the town of Coventry granting
authorization for the commencement of construction on a project.
(3) "Certificate of occupancy" means a certificate issued by the town of Coventry
confirming that a building has been completed in compliance with all building codes and is safe
for occupancy.
(4) "Final approval" means the final authorization given by the town of Coventry following

successful completion of all necessary review and approval processes for a development project.
(5) "Preliminary approval" means the initial approval granted to a development project
after review and recommendation by the appropriate municipal authority.
45-53.1-3. Timelines for approval and permitting.
(a) In the town of Coventry, the period between the granting of preliminary approval and
the granting of final approval for a development project shall not exceed one year.
(b) In the town of Coventry, the period between the granting of final approval and the
issuance of a building permit shall not exceed two (2) years.
(c) In the town of Coventry, if the applicant does not request a building permit within the
two (2) year period following final approval, the application and vesting shall be considered void.
The development process shall need to be restarted, and the applicant will need to resubmit a new
application for review and approval.
45-53.1-4. Temporary addition of units to town's total unit count.
(a) In the town of Coventry, once an applicant requests a building permit, the number of
units approved for the development, including any bonus units, shall be temporarily added to the
total unit count. This count shall be included in the town of Coventry's current housing inventory.
(b) The units, including bonus units, shall be permanently added to the town of Coventry's
unit count upon the issuance of a certificate of occupancy for the development or three (3) years
from the date of the request for a building permit, whichever occurs first.
(c) The town of Coventry shall be allowed to count the units, including bonus units, against
other new developments while the construction is ongoing. This allowance shall ensure that the
town of Coventry remains in compliance with its housing and development goals, while still
providing flexibility to the applicant during the construction phase.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC006316
========
LC006316 - Page 2 of 3